District of Columbia statutes.
22-933

Criminal abuse of a vulnerable adult.

A person is guilty of criminal abuse of a vulnerable adult if that person intentionally or knowingly:

(1)

Inflicts or threatens to inflict physical pain or injury by hitting, slapping, kicking, pinching, biting, pulling hair or other corporal means;

(2)

Uses repeated or malicious oral or written statements that would be considered by a reasonable person to be harassing or threatening; or

(3)

Imposes unreasonable confinement or involuntary seclusion, including but not limited to, the forced separation from other persons against his or her will or the directions of any legal representative.

June 8, 2001, D.C. Law 13-301, § 203, 47 DCR 7039

History